Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.170

Payments to conditionally released persons.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

As funds are available, the secretary may provide payment to a person conditionally released pursuant to RCW 10.77.150, consistent with the provisions of RCW 72.02.100 and 72.02.110, and may adopt rules and regulations to do so.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 17.]